Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2241.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Graduate student services covered.
Notwithstanding any general law, public law, special law, rule or regulation to the contrary,
Medicaid reimbursement shall be provided under this chapter for services provided by a graduate
student intern in one of the mental health professional disciplines who is formally assigned by an
accredited college/university to an agency or facility for clinical training. The graduate student
intern shall be allowed to receive compensation from these reimbursed hours and the supervising
organization is allowed to retain a portion of the compensation to cover expenses related to
supervisory work. A mental health practitioner working as a clinical trainee shall:
(1) Comply with requirements for licensure or board certification as a mental health
professional including supervised practice in the delivery of mental health services for the treatment
of mental illness; or
(2) Be a graduate student in a bona fide field placement or internship under a program
leading to completion of the requirements for licensure as a mental health professional.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003645
========
LC003645 - Page 2 of 3